Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 3
REORGANIZATION OF CITIES AND TOWNS
FORMED UNDER PRIOR LAW

Cross references:

For notices required in municipal dissolution and new incorporation, see § 24-32-109.

31-2-301. Procedure.

Any city or town incorporated prior to July 3, 1877, which has not previously reorganized pursuant to this part 3 may abandon its organization and organize itself under the provisions of this title, with the same territorial limits, by pursuing the course prescribed in this part 3.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1019, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-4-101 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-2-302. Petition - election.

Upon the petition of the registered electors of any such town or city equal in number to ten percent of the votes cast for all candidates for mayor at the last preceding regular election, the governing body thereof shall immediately, by ordinance or resolution, call a special election on the question of organizing under this title. Such question shall be submitted to the registered electors of the city or town at a special election to be held on the date set by the governing body and conducted in accordance with the provisions of the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965", insofar as possible.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1019, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 326, § 76, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-4-102 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965", see article 10 of this title.

31-2-303. Notice of election.

The mayor or, if there is no mayor, the presiding officer of the governing body, immediately upon the effective date of the ordinance or resolution, shall cause notice to be given of the election, of the question to be submitted thereat, and of the time and place of the holding thereof, which notice shall be published once each week for four consecutive weeks in some newspaper of general circulation within the city or town. If there is no such newspaper, publication shall be by posting a copy of said notice in three public places within the municipal limits.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1019, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-4-103 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-2-304. Ballot.

The form of ballot or voting machine tabs at such election shall be: "For Municipal Organization Under the General Law" and "Against Municipal Organization Under the General Law".

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1019, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-4-104 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-2-305. Election of officers - terms.

If a majority of the votes cast at such election are for organization under this title, the governing body shall immediately call a special election for the election of officers for such reorganized city or town. Such election shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965". After the election and qualification of such officers, the former organization of such city or town shall be considered as abandoned, and such city or town shall be considered as organized under the provisions of this title. The officers so elected shall hold their offices only until the next regular election in such city or town.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1019, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-4-105 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965", see article 10 of this title.

31-2-306. No similar proposal for one year.

If a majority of the votes cast at such election are against organization under this title, no petition for another vote upon such question shall be accepted less than one year after such vote.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1019, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-4-103 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-2-307. Property remains vested - rights - cumulative remedy.

All rights and property of every description vested in any city or town under its former organization shall be deemed and held to be vested in the reorganized city or town. No right or liability, either in favor of or against such city or town, existing at the time and no suit or prosecution of any kind shall be affected by such change. Where a different remedy is given by this title which can properly be made applicable to any right existing at the time such change is made, the same shall be deemed cumulative to any other remedies available prior to such change and may be used accordingly.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1019, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-4-106 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-2-308. Duty of county treasurer - sale - redemption.

If any city or town abandons its old organization and incorporates under this title, it is the duty of the county treasurer to collect, in the same manner as other taxes are collected, any taxes of such city or town which, at the time of such incorporation, have become due or delinquent. If property has been sold before such reorganization for taxes due any such city or town and the same has not been redeemed nor the deed executed therefor prior to incorporation, it is the duty of the county treasurer to act in all respects regarding the redemption of such property, the collection of taxes thereon, and the execution of the deed therefor as though the same had been sold subsequent to such reorganization.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1019, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-4-108 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-2-309. Ordinances remain effective.

When any city or town incorporated prior to July 3, 1877, reorganizes under this title, the bylaws and ordinances adopted and in force in such city or town previous to such reorganization shall remain in full force and effect for all purposes until the same are changed, amended, or repealed by the governing body elected under the new organization.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1020, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-4-110 as it existed prior to 1975.